Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-406
Warrant; to whom directed; contents.

The warrant shall be directed to the sheriff of the county or to the marshal or other police officer of a city or village and, reciting the substance of the accusation, shall command the officer to take the accused and bring him or her before the magistrate or court issuing the warrant or some other magistrate having cognizance of the case to be dealt with according to law. No seal shall be necessary to the validity of the warrant.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 288, p. 790;

R.S.1913, § 8942;

C.S.1922, § 9966;

C.S.1929, § 29-406;

R.S.1943, § 29-406;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 167;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 24.

If defendant is in court when complaint is filed, warrant need not issue. Cohoe v. State, 79 Neb. 811, 113 N.W. 532 (1907).

Validity of warrant will not be inquired into by district court when accused has waived preliminary and given bond. Bartley v. State, 53 Neb. 310, 73 N.W. 744 (1898).

Police officer is commanded to take an accused under arrest before a magistrate. Gallegos v. Nebraska, 342 U.S. 55 (1951).